Tennessee statutes. Title 42 Aeronautics
Part 1 General Provisions
42-3-111. Bonds and other obligations.

An authority has the power to borrow money for any of its corporate purposes and issue its bonds therefor, including refunding bonds, in such form and upon such terms as it may determine, payable out of any revenues of the authority, including grants or contributions from the federal government or other sources, which bonds may be sold at public sale at not less than par. Revenue bonds may be issued for the above purposes and the authority may pledge as security for such bonds all or any portion of the landing fees, concession fees, rents, charges, or any other revenues derived from the operation of the airport. Revenue bonds shall be issued in accordance with the applicable provisions of title 9, chapter 21; provided, that any fees, rents, or charges so pledged that are fixed and established pursuant to the provisions of a lease or contract shall not be subject to revision or change except in such manner as is provided in such lease or contract. Any bonds of any authority issued pursuant to this chapter that are payable, as to principal and interest, solely from revenues of an airport or air navigation facility (and they shall so state on their face) shall not constitute a debt of any municipality, the state, or any political subdivision thereof other than the authority, and shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction. Neither the commissioners of an authority nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally thereon by reason of the issuance of the bonds.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), the requirements of § 9-21-304 shall not apply to the issuance of revenue bonds by an authority hereunder, and any revenue bonds issued under this section without compliance with § 9-21-304 are hereby ratified and validated.

In case any of the commissioners or officers of an authority whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons cease to be commissioners or officers after authorization but before the delivery of the bonds, the signatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if the commissioners or officers had remained in office until delivery. Any provision of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be fully negotiable.

Any bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by an authority pursuant to this chapter and for a purpose or purposes authorized to be accomplished by this chapter shall be conclusively deemed, in any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforceability of the bond or the security for the bond, to have been issued pursuant to this chapter and for such purpose or purposes.

Bonds issued by an authority pursuant to this chapter are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose, and, together with interest on the bonds and income from the bonds, shall be exempt from all taxes.

As used in this subsection (e), “airport” has the same meaning as defined in § 42-3-102 and includes:

Any one (1) or more airports or heliports and related facilities, including land and interests in land, facilities for storage of air and space craft, navigation and landing aids, taxiways, pads, aprons, control towers, passenger and cargo terminal buildings, hangars, administration and office buildings, garages, parking lots, and such other structures, facilities, and improvements necessary or convenient to the development and maintenance of airports and heliports, and for the promotion and accommodation of air and space travel, commerce, and navigation; and

Any projects or improvements, or both, for which a regional airport authority formed pursuant to § 42-3-104(a)(3) would be eligible to receive grant funds from the federal aviation administration, or any comparable federal or state agency.

In addition to subsections (a)-(d), any regional airport authority formed pursuant to § 42-3-104(a)(3) has the power to borrow money for any corporate purposes and issue revenue bonds for any corporate purposes, including revenue refunding bonds, in such form and upon such terms as the authority may determine, payable out of any revenues of the authority, including grants or contributions from the federal government or other sources. The bonds may be sold at public or private sale. Revenue bonds may be issued for any corporate purposes and the authority may pledge as security for the bonds all or any portion of concessions, fees, rents, charges, or any other revenues derived from the operation of an airport or air navigation facility. The payment or purchase of the revenue bonds may be additionally secured, in whole or in part, in the manner provided in this section, by a pledge of the full faith and credit and unlimited taxing powers of all or any of the participating municipalities and counties with respect to which the authority has been created. The revenue bonds or revenue refunding bonds shall be issued in the manner provided for revenue bonds issued by a local government in the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, compiled in title 9, chapter 21; provided, that any such fees, rents, or charges so pledged that are fixed and established pursuant to a lease or contract are not subject to revision or change except in such manner as is provided in the lease or contract. Any bonds of any authority issued pursuant to this chapter that are payable, as to principal and interest, solely from revenues of an airport or air navigation facility, which the bonds shall state on their face, shall not constitute a debt of any municipality, the state, or any other political subdivision of the state, other than the authority or any participating municipality or county, or both, guaranteeing the payment or purchase of the bonds in the manner provided in this chapter, and shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction. Neither the commissioners of any authority nor any person executing the bonds shall be personally liable on the bonds by reason of the issuance of the bonds.

The governing bodies of the participating municipalities or counties, or both, with respect to which a regional airport authority has been formed pursuant to § 42-3-104(a)(3), may, by resolution, pledge the full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of the participating municipalities or counties, or both, as guarantors to the payment of the principal or premium, if any, and interest on bonds of an authority, the purchase price of any such bonds subject to optional or mandatory tender for purchase, or the reimbursement or repayment to any bank or financial institution under any agreement providing for any draw, borrowing, advance, or payment to be made for the payment of the principal, premium, interest, or purchase price.

Prior to any meeting where the guarantee will be considered by any governing body of a participating municipality or a county, or both, a notice shall be published at least five (5) days in advance of the meeting in a newspaper of general circulation within the participating municipality or county, or both, as applicable, describing the matter to be considered and containing an estimate of the dollar amount of any contingent liability proposed to be undertaken by the participating municipality or county, or both.

In the event of any such pledge of the full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of the participating municipalities or counties, or both, any holder of the bonds, including a trustee for holders of the bonds or any financial institution providing any agreement on the payment of principal, premium, interest, or purchase price on the bonds shall have the right, in addition to all other rights, by mandamus or other suit, action, or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction, to enforce the holder's rights against the participating municipalities or counties, or both, so pledging, and the participating municipalities or counties, or both, and any officer, agent, or employee of the participating municipalities or counties, or both, including the right to require the participating municipalities or counties, or both, and governing bodies and any proper officer, agent, or employee of the participating municipalities or counties, or both, levy, and collect taxes and other revenues and charges adequate to carry out any agreement as to, or pledge of, the taxes, revenues, and charges. The taxes authorized to be pledged in this subdivision (f)(3) shall be levied without limit as to rate or amount upon all taxable property within the participating municipalities or counties, or both, providing the guaranty, and all such taxes to be levied are hereby declared to have been levied for county and corporation purposes, respectively, within the meaning of the Constitution of Tennessee, Article II, § 29.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 10; T.C.A., § 42-611; Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 11; 1988, ch. 750, § 48; 2014, ch. 698, § 1; 2017, ch. 128, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 698, § 2 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to all revenue bonds issued pursuant to §42-3-111 irrespective of whether such revenue bonds are issued before or after April 15, 2014.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment added (a)(2).

The 2017 amendment added (e) and (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 698, § 2. April 15, 2014.

Acts 2017, ch. 128, § 2. April 17, 2017.

Cross-References. Maximum effective rates of interest, §47-14-103.

42-3-112. Operation and use privileges.

Operation by Authority.

In connection with the operation of an airport or air navigation facility owned, leased or controlled by an authority, the authority may, except as may be limited by the terms and conditions of any grant, loan or agreement, enter into contracts, leases, agreements, grants or other arrangements for terms not to exceed fifty (50) years with any person or persons; provided, that the public is not deprived of its rightful use of the airport or air navigation facility:

Granting the privilege of using or improving the airport or air navigation facility, including buildings or structures relating to the airport or air navigation facility, or real property acquired or set aside for such purposes, or any portion or facility of the airport or air navigation facility or space in the airport or air navigation facility for commercial purposes, establishing the charges, rentals or fees at a fixed or variable rate binding upon the parties for the full terms such contracts, leases, agreements, grants or other arrangements, which contracts, leases, agreements, grants or other arrangements may provide for the resolution of disputes arising thereunder or for the fixing of variable terms therein through arbitration or similar procedure;

Conferring the privilege of supplying goods, commodities, things, services or facilities at the airport or air navigation facility;

Making available services to be furnished by the authority or its agents at the airport or air navigation facility; and

Determining the charges, rentals or fees for the use of any properties under its control, and the charges for any services or accommodations, and the terms and conditions under which the properties may be used, except that any charges, rentals and fees as may be fixed or determined by any contract, lease, agreement, grant or other arrangement of privileges, uses, services, accommodations or concessions to which the authority is a party or is the grantor, shall, if so expressly provided therein, be binding upon all parties thereto for the full terms prescribed therein, unless the same is sooner modified or terminated by mutual consent of the parties.

In each case, the authority may establish the terms and conditions and fix the charges, rentals or fees for the privileges, uses or services or use of buildings or structures that shall be reasonable and uniform for the same class of privilege or services and shall be established with due regard to the property and improvements used and the expenses of operation to the authority; provided, that in no case shall the public be deprived of its rightful, equal and uniform use of the airport, air navigation facility, or portion of such airport or facility.

Other Operation. Except as may be limited by the terms and conditions of any grant, loan or agreement authorized by § 42-3-114, an authority may by contract, lease, or other arrangements, upon a consideration fixed by it, grant to any qualified person for a term not to exceed fifty (50) years, the privilege of operating, as agent of the authority or otherwise, any airport owned or controlled by the authority; provided, that no person shall be granted any authority to operate an airport other than as a public airport or to enter into any contracts, leases or other arrangements in connection with the operation of the airport that the authority might not have undertaken under subsection (a).

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 11; T.C.A., § 42-612.

Attorney General Opinions. Because an airport authority has discretion to determine the fees applicable to businesses operating on its property when it enters into contracts or other agreements with those businesses, it may impose a fuel flowage fee as part of those agreements. An airport authority may enter into agreements that require non-profit entities to pay fuel flowage fees. OAG 18-32, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 31 (7/20/2018).

Cited: Niswonger v. American Aviation, Inc., 424 F. Supp. 1080, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16844 (E.D. Tenn. 1976).

42-3-113. Regulations — Scope — Conformity with state and federal law.

An authority is authorized to adopt, amend and repeal such reasonable resolutions, rules, regulations and orders as it deems necessary for the management, government and use of any airport or air navigation facility owned by it or under its control. No rule, regulation, order or standard prescribed by the department shall be inconsistent with, or contrary to, any act of congress or any regulation promulgated or standard established pursuant thereto or be inconsistent with, or contrary to, any act of the general assembly or any regulation promulgated or standard established pursuant to such act. The authority shall keep on file at the principal office of the authority for public inspection a copy of all its rules and regulations.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 12; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 16; T.C.A., § 42-613.

42-3-114. Federal and state aid.

Acceptance Authorized; Conditions. Except as otherwise provided by law, an authority is authorized to accept, receive, receipt for, disburse and expend federal and state moneys and other moneys, public or private, made available by grant or loan, or both, to accomplish, in whole or in part, any of the purposes of this chapter. All federal moneys accepted under this section shall be accepted and expended by the authority upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the United States and as are consistent with state law; and state moneys accepted under this section shall be accepted and expended by the authority upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the state.

Department of Transportation as Agent for Authorities in Receiving Certain Federal Funds; Exceptions.

The department shall act as agent for each authority for the purposes of applying for, receiving and disbursing federal funds made available pursuant to the former Airport and Airway Development Act of 1970, 84 Stat. 219, 49 U.S.C. 1970 ed., § 1701 et seq. [repealed], or any amendment thereto, unless an authority owns an airport having a minimum of twenty-five thousand (25,000) originating enplanements annually on regularly scheduled airline carriers as certified by the federal civil aeronautics board, in which event the authority may act as principal with respect to any airport owned by it, or may designate the department as its agent for the purposes mentioned in this subdivision (b)(1). All funds received by the department shall be deposited in the state treasury to be kept and disbursed in a manner consistent with federal requirements.

Whenever the department acts as agent, it may do so for an individual authority or authorities acting jointly and the applicable provisions of § 42-2-203(c) shall apply under either circumstance.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 13; 1977, ch. 277, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 42-614.

Compiler's Notes. The Airport and Airway Development Act of 1970, 84 Stat. 219, 49 U.S.C. 1970 ed. § 1701 et seq., referred to in this section, was repealed in 1982.

Cross-References. Application for federal funds, department of transportation to act as agent for municipalities and airport authorities, §42-2-223.

42-3-115. Public purposes.

The acquisition of any land, or interest in land, pursuant to this chapter, the planning, acquisition, establishment, development, construction, improvement, maintenance, equipment, operation, regulation and protection of airports, air navigation facilities and avigation easements, including the acquisition or elimination of airport hazards and the exercise of any other powers granted in this chapter to authorities and other public agencies, to be severally or jointly exercised, are declared to be public and governmental functions, exercised for a public purpose, and matters of public necessity. All land and other property and privileges acquired and used by or on behalf of any authority or other public agency in the manner and for the purposes enumerated in this chapter shall and are declared to be acquired and used for public and governmental purposes and as a matter of public necessity.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 15; T.C.A., § 42-620.

Cited: Niswonger v. American Aviation, Inc., 424 F. Supp. 1080, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16844 (E.D. Tenn. 1976).

42-3-116. Status of airport authorities — Property and revenues exempt from taxation.

It is declared that airport authorities created pursuant to this chapter are public and governmental bodies acting as agencies and instrumentalities of the creating and participating municipalities, and that the acquiring, operating, and financing of airports and related facilities by such airport authorities are for a public and governmental purpose and matters of public necessity.

The property and revenues of the authority or any interest in such property and revenues are exempt from all state, county, and municipal taxation.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 16; T.C.A., § 42-621; Acts 2020, ch. 680, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote the section which read: “Any property in this state acquired by an authority for airport purposes pursuant to this chapter, and any income derived by the authority from the ownership, operation or control of that property, shall be exempt from taxation to the same extent as other property used for public purposes.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 680, § 2. June 15, 2020.

42-3-117. Authority of municipal corporations.

For the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the planning, undertaking, construction or operation of airports and air navigation facilities, and acquiring avigation easements pursuant to this chapter, any municipality for which an authority has been created may, upon such terms, with or without consideration as it may determine:

Lend or donate money to the authority;

Provide that all or a portion of the taxes or funds available or to become available to, or required by law to be used by, the municipality for airport purposes, be transferred or paid directly to the airport authority as the funds become available to the municipality;

Cause water, sewer or drainage facilities, or any other facilities that it is empowered to provide, to be furnished adjacent to or in connection with airports or air navigation facilities;

Dedicate, sell, convey or lease any of its interest in any property, or grant easements, licenses or any other rights or privileges in property to the authority;

Furnish, dedicate, close, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan or replan streets, roads, roadways and walks from established streets or roads to airports or air navigation facilities;

Do any and all things, whether or not specifically authorized in this section and not otherwise prohibited by law, that are necessary or convenient to aid and cooperate with the authority in the planning, undertaking, constructing or operating of airports and air navigation facilities; and

Enter into agreements with the authority respecting action to be taken by the municipality pursuant to this section.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 17; T.C.A., § 42-622.

Attorney General Opinions. Dissolution of a municipal airport authority created under the Airport Authorities Act. OAG 16-14, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (4/5/2016).

42-3-118. Supplementary authority.

The powers conferred by this chapter are in addition to the powers conferred by any other law, and are not in substitution for such powers, and the limitations imposed by this chapter shall not affect powers conferred by any other law.

The powers granted by this chapter may be exercised without regard to requirements, restrictions, or procedural provisions contained in any other law or chapter, except as expressly provided in this chapter.

In addition to the general and special powers conferred by this chapter, every authority is authorized to exercise such powers as are necessarily incidental to the exercise of such general and special powers.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 18; T.C.A., § 42-623; Acts 2011, ch. 139, § 3.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment added (a) and (b) and redesignated the former section as (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 139, § 4. May 2, 2011.

Attorney General Opinions. Dissolution of a municipal airport authority created under the Airport Authorities Act. OAG 16-14, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (4/5/2016).

42-3-119. Municipal zoning authority unaffected.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to limit any right, power or authority of a municipality to regulate airport hazards by zoning.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 19; T.C.A., § 42-624.

42-3-120. Written agreement between peer-to-peer car sharing program and airport.
[Effective on February 1, 2021.]

As used in this section, “peer-to-peer car sharing program” means a business platform that connects vehicle owners with drivers to enable the sharing of vehicles for financial consideration.

If a peer-to-peer car sharing program conducts business at an airport or otherwise uses airport facilities, then the program shall enter into a written agreement with an airport, or the entity responsible for regulating commerce at the airport, within this state.

Acts 2020, ch. 796, § 3.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 796, § 8. February 1, 2021.